Massachusetts, session 194th, H2552.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled,
and by the authority of the same, as follows: The second paragraph of section 1L of chapter 69 of
the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding, in
after the word “resuscitation” the following− and the use of automatic external defibrillators.
Instruction in hands only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of automatic external
defibrillators must be the most current national evidence−based Emergency Cardiovascular Care
guidelines and incorporate psychomotor skills development into the instruction as part of a
graduation requirement. “Psychomotor skills” is defined as the use of hands-on practicing and
skills testing to support cognitive learning. A licensed teacher shall not be required to be a
certified trainer of cardiopulmonary resuscitation, to facilitate, provide or oversee such
of 2

instruction for non-certification. Courses which result in a certification being earned are required
to be taught by an authorized CPR/AED instructor.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department
of elementary and secondary education, based on available appropriations, in Chapter 69,
Section 11, will allow as part of the discretionary grant program to provide financial incentives
for school districts who require psychomotor skill-based CPR and AED training prior to
graduation.
(1) Psychomotor Skill-Based hands only CPR Training shall be based on national
Guidelines for CPR and ECC which incorporates the use of hands-on practicing.
(2) These incentives can be in the form of mini-grants or subsidies to support equipment,
professional development for psychomotor skills-based CPR training for students to provide
hands only CPR training and use of an automated external defibrillator. There shall be a priority
for school districts that are considered high needs as defined as where at least 50% of children
are eligible to receive free and reduced priced meals or the school participates in the Community
Eligibility Provision or Universal Free Meals or high-need schools may also be defined by Title
1 status.
of 2